District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.110

Foreign corporations — Merger; filing of articles of merger; name change requires new or amended certificate of authority.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 224, ch. 269, § 110
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.110.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.11.
1973 Ed., § 29-933k.